Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-219. Computation date.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “computation date” means June 30 of the preceding calendar year.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1963, No. 93, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.

11-10-220. Educational institutions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “institution of higher education” means an educational institution that:

Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high school or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate;

Is legally authorized in this state to provide a program of education beyond high school;

Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's or higher degree, provides a program which is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree, or offers a program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; and

Is a public or other nonprofit institution.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of subdivision (a)(1) of this section, all colleges and universities in this state are institutions of higher education for purposes of this section.

For the purposes of this chapter, an educational institution, other than an institution of higher education, is one:

In which participants, trainees, or students are offered an organized course of study or training designed to transfer to them knowledge, skills, information, doctrines, attitudes, or abilities from, by, or under the guidance of an instructor or teacher;

Which is approved, licensed, or issued a permit to operate as a school by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education or other government agency that is authorized within the state to approve, license, or issue a permit for the operation of a school;

Which offers a course of study or training which may be academic, technical, trade, or in preparation for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; and

Which does not meet the definition of “institution of higher education” as set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1971, No. 35, § 6; 1977, No. 376, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2222.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (b)(2).

11-10-221. Hospital.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “hospital” means an institution that has been licensed, certified, or approved by the Division of Health Facilities Services of the Department of Health, as a hospital.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1971, No. 35, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.

11-10-222. United States.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the term “United States”, when used in a geographical sense, includes the states, the District of Columbia, and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1963, No. 93, § 2; 1971, No. 35, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.

11-10-223. Supplemental benefit payments.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the term “supplemental benefit payments” means unemployment benefit payments made under a private unemployment compensation plan.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103; reen. Acts 1987, No. 672, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 672, § 1. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

11-10-224. References to gender.

Throughout this chapter, the pronoun “he” is deemed to include the masculine gender, the feminine gender, and, in the case of employers who are not persons, the neuter gender.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1983, No. 482, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.

11-10-225. American vessel.

“American vessel” means any vessel documented or numbered under the laws of the United States; and includes any vessel which is neither documented or numbered under the laws of the United States nor documented under the laws of any foreign country, if its crew is employed solely by one (1) or more citizens or residents of the United States or corporations organized under the laws of the United States or of any state.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1971, No. 35, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.

11-10-226. American aircraft.

“American aircraft” means an aircraft registered under the laws of the United States.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1971, No. 35, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.

11-10-227. Treatment of Indian tribes.

The term “employer” shall include any Indian tribe for which service in employment as defined under this chapter is performed.

The term “employment” shall include service performed in the employ of an Indian tribe, as defined in section 3306(u) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, provided the service is excluded from “employment” as defined in the Federal Unemployment Tax Act solely by reason of section 3306(c)(7) and is not otherwise excluded from “employment” under this chapter. For purposes of this section, the exclusions from employment in § 11-10-210(a)(4) shall be applicable to services performed in the employ of an Indian tribe.

The term “tribal unit” means subdivisions, subsidiaries, and business enterprises wholly owned by an Indian tribe.

Benefits based on service in employment defined in this section shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of other service subject under this chapter.

Indian tribes or tribal units subject to this chapter shall pay contributions under the same terms and conditions as all other subject employers unless they elect to pay into the state unemployment fund amounts equal to the amount of benefits attributable to service in the employ of the Indian tribe.

Indian tribes electing to make payments in lieu of contributions must make the election in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided in § 11-10-713 pertaining to state and local governments and nonprofit organizations subject to this chapter. Indian tribes will determine if reimbursement for benefits paid shall be elected by the tribe as a whole, by individual tribal units, or by combinations of individual tribal units.

Indian tribes or tribal units shall be billed for the full amount of benefits attributable to service in the employ of the Indian tribe or tribal unit on the same schedule as other employing units that have elected to make payments in lieu of contributions.

Failure of the Indian tribe or tribal unit to make required payments, including assessments of interest and penalty, within ninety (90) days after receipt of the bill shall cause the Indian tribe to lose the option to make payments in lieu of contributions, as described in subsection (e) of this section, for the following tax year unless payment in full is received before contribution rates for the next tax year are computed.

Any Indian tribe that loses the option to make payments in lieu of contributions due to late payment or nonpayment, as described in subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section, shall have the option reinstated if, after a period of one (1) year, all contributions have been made timely, provided that no contributions, payments in lieu of contributions for benefits paid, penalties, or interest remain outstanding.

Failure of the Indian tribe or any tribal unit thereof to make required payments, including assessments of interest and penalty, after all collection activities deemed necessary by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services have been exhausted shall cause services performed for the tribe to not be treated as “employment” for purposes of subsection (b) of this section.

The director may determine that any Indian tribe that loses coverage under subdivision (f)(2)(A) of this section may have services performed for the tribe again included as “employment” for purposes of subsection (b) of this section if all contributions, payments in lieu of contributions, penalties, and interest have been paid.

If an Indian tribe fails to make payments required under subdivisions (f)(2)(A) and (B) of this section, including assessments of interest and penalty, within ninety (90) days after a final notice of delinquency, the director will immediately notify the Internal Revenue Service and the United States Department of Labor.

Notices of payment and reporting delinquency to Indian tribes or their tribal units shall include information that failure to make full payment within the prescribed time frame:

Shall cause the Indian tribe to be liable for taxes under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act;

Shall cause the Indian tribe to lose the option to make payments in lieu of contributions; and

Could cause the Indian tribe to be excepted from the definition of “employer”, as provided in subsection (a) of this section, and services in the employ of the Indian tribe, as provided in subsection (b) of this section, to be excepted from “employment”.

Extended benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of an Indian tribe and not reimbursed by the United States Government shall be financed in their entirety by the Indian tribe.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1467, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 186.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (f)(2)(A).

U.S. Code.

Sections 3306 (c)(7) and 3306(u) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act,
referred to in this section, are codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 3306(c)(7) and (3306)(u), respectively.